Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2763.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-621, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-621. Recording proximity to shooting range; closure requirements; definition A. A city with a population of more than one million persons shall execute and record in the office of the county recorder a document relating to real property located within one-half mile of the exterior boundaries of any shooting range that is owned by this state and that is located within or adjacent to the exterior municipal boundaries on or before January 1, 2004. The city attorney shall prepare the document in recordable form. The document must be on eight and one-half inch by eleven inch paper containing the following information in twelve point type: 1. A legal description of the property within one-half mile of the exterior boundaries of the shooting range.  To assist in identifying that property, the game and fish commission shall submit the legal description of the shooting range to the city attorney. 2. The following disclosure: This property is located within one-half mile of the exterior boundaries of a shooting range and may be subject to: 1. Increased noise. 2. Restrictions on the use of the property under the city's general plan and zoning ordinances. B. The game and fish commission shall not close a shooting range described in this section unless all of the following occur: 1. The director of the department recommends the closure in writing. 2. The commission issues a report detailing the basis for the recommendation. 3. The commission unanimously approves the closure after public hearings have been held to discuss the closure in the three counties with the highest population. 4. The joint committee on capital review reviews the closure recommendation. 5. The legislature adopts a joint resolution approving the closure. 5. 6. The governor approves the closure in an executive order. C. For the purposes of this section, "shooting range": 1. Means a permanently located and improved area that is designed and operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder or any other similar sport shooting in an outdoor environment.  Shooting range 2. Does not include: 1. (a) Any area for the exclusive use of archery or air guns. 2. (b) An enclosed indoor facility that is designed to offer a totally controlled shooting environment and that includes impenetrable walls, floor and ceiling, adequate ventilation, lighting systems and acoustical treatment for sound attenuation suitable for the range's approved use. 3. (c) A national guard facility located in a city or town with a population of more than one million persons. 4. (d) A facility that was not owned by this state before January 1, 2002. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.